Wisconsin, session 2025, SB175.
do enact as follows:SB175,14Section 1. 66.0628 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 66.0628 (1) (as).SB175,25Section 2. 66.0628 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB175,1,6666.0628 (1) (ag) “Disabled veteran” has the meaning given in s. 45.437 (1).SB175,31Section 3. 66.0628 (2s) of the statutes is created to read:SB175,2,4266.0628 (2s) (a) A political subdivision shall reduce by 75 percent or $500, 3whichever reduction is less, any fee it charges for a building permit if all of the 4following apply:SB175,2,651. The permit is for improvements to the primary residence of a disabled 6veteran.SB175,2,872. The improvements under subd. 1. are necessary to accommodate a 8disability of the disabled veteran.SB175,2,1093. The residence under subd. 1. is owned by the disabled veteran or a 10caretaker of the disabled veteran.SB175,2,1211(b) A political subdivision may require proof of all of the following before 12providing a fee reduction under par. (a):SB175,2,14131. That the disabled veteran satisfies the definition of disabled veteran under 14s. 45.437 (1).SB175,2,15152. That the residence is the primary residence of the disabled veteran.SB175,2,17163. That the improvements are necessary to accommodate a disability of the 17disabled veteran.SB175,2,19184. That the residence is owned by the disabled veteran or a caretaker of the 19disabled veteran.SB175,2,2020